Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-203
Permit; business location; prohibited activities.

No person shall be allowed to do business in more than one location under one permit. Each permit shall state the place where such business is to be carried on, and shall not be assigned. Goods, wares, and merchandise shall be kept or stored only at those locations specifically listed in the permit application.

It shall be unlawful for any person not having a permit as required in section 69-202 to display any sign or advertisement stating that money is lent on goods or that goods are purchased as described in section 69-201.

Laws 1899, c. 10, § 3, p. 65;

R.S.1913, § 538;

C.S.1922, § 430;

C.S.1929, § 69-203;

R.S.1943, § 69-203;

Laws 1981, LB 44, § 3.